Utah statutes.
24-4-111.   Compensation for damaged property.

(1)  If property seized for forfeiture is returned by operation of this chapter, a claimant has a civil right of action against a seizing agency for any claim based upon the negligent destruction, loss, damage, or other injury to seized property while in the possession or custody of the agency.

(2)  As used in this section, "damage or other injury" does not include normal depreciation, deterioration, or ordinary wear and tear.



Enacted by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

